Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
LOST, STOLEN, DESTROYED,

DEFACED
BONDS AND COUPONS

§47-41 Request for replacement or payment.
Any party claiming ownership of a bond issued by a county or any interest
coupon appertaining to any bond of that county and which bond, coupon, or both,
as the case may be, has been lost, stolen, destroyed, wholly or in part, or so
defaced as to impair its value, may file with the director of finance of that
county a request for replacement or payment of the bond, coupon or both, as the
case may be. The request shall be in the form of an affidavit describing the
bond, coupon, or both, as the case may be, and explaining the circumstances
under which the bond, coupon, or both, as the case may be, was lost, stolen,
destroyed or defaced. The affidavit shall be presented with such evidence as
the director of finance may require to establish the ownership of the bond,
coupon, or both. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next